src/fst/morphology/stems/smi-abbreviations.lexc
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@uit.no or feedback@divvun.no

! ===============================================
!! !!!File containing common Nordic abbreviations 
! ===============================================

!! !!Lexica for adding tags and periods
! ----------------------------------

!! Splitting in 4 + 1 groups, because of the preprocessor
!  - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -

LEXICON Abbreviation-smi !!= * __@CODE@__
smi_ITRAB ;	  !!= # The @CODE@ lexicon (intransitive abbrs)
smi_TRNUMAB ; !!= # The @CODE@ lexicon (abbrs trans wrt. numberals)
smi_TRAB ;	  !!= # The @CODE@ lexicon (transitive abbrs)
ALPHABET ;

!! !!The abbreviation lexicon itself
! ----------------------------------


! ==========================
! Intransitive abbreviations 
! ==========================

LEXICON ALPHABET ! For Apertium
< [A|B|C|D|E|F|G|H|I|J|K|L|M|N|O|P|Q|R|S|T|U|V|W|Y|Z|Æ|Ø|Å|Á|Â|Ô|Š|Č] >  ALPHABET-TAGS ;
a:A ALPHABET-TAGS ;
b:B ALPHABET-TAGS ;
c:C ALPHABET-TAGS ;
d:D ALPHABET-TAGS ;
e:E ALPHABET-TAGS ;
f:F ALPHABET-TAGS ;
g:G ALPHABET-TAGS ;
h:H ALPHABET-TAGS ;
i:I ALPHABET-TAGS ;
j:J ALPHABET-TAGS ;
k:K ALPHABET-TAGS ;
l:L ALPHABET-TAGS ;
m:M ALPHABET-TAGS ;
n:N ALPHABET-TAGS ;
o:O ALPHABET-TAGS ;
p:P ALPHABET-TAGS ;
q:Q ALPHABET-TAGS ;
r:R ALPHABET-TAGS ;
s:S ALPHABET-TAGS ;
t:T ALPHABET-TAGS ;
u:U ALPHABET-TAGS ;
v:V ALPHABET-TAGS ;
w:W ALPHABET-TAGS ;
x:X ALPHABET-TAGS ;
y:Y ALPHABET-TAGS ;
z:Z ALPHABET-TAGS ;
æ:Æ ALPHABET-TAGS ;
ø:Ø ALPHABET-TAGS ;
å:Å ALPHABET-TAGS ;
ä:Ä ALPHABET-TAGS ;
ö:Ö ALPHABET-TAGS ;
á:Á ALPHABET-TAGS ;
š:Š ALPHABET-TAGS ;
č:Č ALPHABET-TAGS ;

LEXICON ALPHABET-TAGS ! For apertium
alphabet+N+Sem/Sign+Use/MT: ab-dot-noun-trab ;
alphabet+N+Sem/Sign+Use/MT+ABBR: RHyph ;
